Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 2. Roads to State Land Programmed for Surface Disposal.

Revisor’s notes. —

Through administrative reorganization, the Department of Natural Resources has eliminated the division of lands. Duties and responsibilities given to the division of lands under this title have been assigned to other divisions of the department.

Sec. 19.30.060.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of AS

19.30.060

—

19.30.100

to provide access to state land that is programmed for surface disposal, and to provide access roads at the lowest possible cost.

History.

(§ 1 ch 122 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1964)

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets and Bridges, § 200 et seq.

39A C.J.S., Highways, § 135 et seq.

Liability of strip or other surface mine or quarry operator to person on highway injured or killed during blasting operations. 84 ALR2d 737.

Sec. 19.30.070.
Contracts for construction of roads.

The director of the division of lands may contract with private persons for the construction of roads to and on state land programmed for surface disposal that are not more than six miles from existing roads or highways.
Contracts under this section are governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

History.

(§ 1 ch 122 SLA 1961; am § 2 ch 7 SLA 1964; am § 16 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 19.30.080.
Construction standards and maintenance.

An access road constructed under AS

19.30.060

—

19.30.100

shall be of low standard, not necessarily suitable for all weather use. The state is not under obligation to maintain an access road constructed under AS

19.30.060

—

19.30.100

.
If an access road is constructed outside a municipality that has zoning ordinances, the right-of-way width for the road shall be determined by the division of lands and the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.
If an access road is constructed within the boundaries of a municipality that has zoning ordinances, the right-of-way width shall conform to the subdivision control ordinances of the municipality. Contracts for the work on an access road are governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

History.

(§ 1 ch 122 SLA 1961; am § 3 ch 7 SLA 1964; am § 50 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 17 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 19.30.090.
Payment of construction costs in land credit certificates.

The cost of constructing access roads to state land shall be paid in freely transferable land credit certificates which may be applied toward the purchase or lease of any state land under the jurisdiction of the division of lands, except tide, submerged, and shoreland and land belonging to the state which have been obtained by escheat, purchase, or any means other than by general land grant.
A land credit certificate is valid for a period of 20 years after issue.
After the expiration of 20 years from date of issue the holder may not start an action against the state or any person based upon the certificate.
The method of disposing of land and resources and restrictions upon their disposal established by law or regulation are in no way affected by the use of land credit certificates.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1961; am § 4 ch 7 SLA 1964)

Sec. 19.30.100.
Commissioner of natural resources may adopt regulations.

The commissioner of natural resources may adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

19.30.060

—

19.30.100

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 122 SLA 1961)

Administrative Code. —

For subdivision development standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 4.